Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-310
Officers and employees; compensation fixed by ordinance.

The officers and employees in cities of the first class shall receive such compensation as the mayor and city council shall fix by ordinance.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 17, p. 234;

Laws 1901, c. 19, § 1, p. 306;

Laws 1903, c. 19, § 4, p. 234;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 108;

R.S.1913, § 4876;

Laws 1915, c. 85, § 2, p. 224;

Laws 1917, c. 95, § 1, p. 253;

Laws 1919, c. 36, § 1, p. 117;

C.S.1922, § 4044;

C.S.1929, § 16-306;

Laws 1943, c. 30, § 1, p. 139;

R.S. 1943, § 16-310;

Laws 1947, c. 25, § 1, p. 126;

Laws 1955, c. 29, § 1, p. 134;

Laws 1963, c. 62, § 1, p. 255;

Laws 1965, c. 50, § 1, p. 251;

Laws 1969, c. 75, § 1, p. 404;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 55.

The clerk is required to perform all his duties for a compensation not to exceed the amount previously fixed by the council. City of Scottsbluff v. Southern Surety Company, 124 Neb. 260, 246 N.W. 346 (1933).

Where no ordinance fixing salaries was in effect, at time of the election, the fixing of salaries by the council after the election did not constitute raising such salaries. Wheelock v. McDowell, 20 Neb. 160, 29 N.W. 291 (1886).